Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4623
Modifying or terminating grant of custodial responsibility to nonparent.

(a) Except for an order under section 43-4617, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, and consistent with the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. appendix sections 521 and 522, as the act exists on January 1, 2015, on motion of a deploying or other parent or any nonparent to whom caretaking authority, decisionmaking authority, or limited contact has been granted, the court may modify or terminate the grant if the modification or termination is consistent with sections 43-4613 to 43-4623 and it is in the best interest of the child. A modification is temporary and terminates pursuant to sections 43-4624 to 43-4627 after the deploying parent returns from deployment, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order.

(b) On motion of a deploying parent, the court shall terminate a grant of limited contact.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 23.